Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-1,103
Reserved brands; use.

(1) Cattle brands consisting of alphabetical letters A through Z, and numbers 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7, 8, and 9 on the left or right jaw are reserved for assignment by the brand recorder, as designated by the Nebraska Brand Committee. The brand recorder shall not assign such brands to any person in the State of Nebraska unless authorized by the brand committee, and it shall be unlawful for any person to use such brands except as provided in subsection (2) of this section.

(2) Every person when spaying heifers, upon request of the owner thereof, shall brand such heifers with the alphabetical letter O on the left jaw and furnish the owner with a certificate that all heifers so branded have been properly spayed by a licensed veterinarian. Permission may be granted by the brand committee to state and federal animal disease control agencies to require the use of the letters F, V, B, S, and T and an open-end spade on either the right or left jaw of cattle in a manner consistent with animal disease control laws.

Laws 1999, LB 778, § 34.